Florida, session 2026, HB345.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1002.71, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.71 Funding; financial and attendance reporting.—
(3)(a) Each private prekindergarten provider and public
school delivering the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
Program shall be paid a separate base student allocation per
full-time equivalent student as in the Voluntary Prekindergarten
Education Program shall be provided in the General
Appropriations Act.
1. Beginning with the 2026-2027 program year, the base
student allocation for a school-year prekindergarten program and
for a summer prekindergarten program may not be less than the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb345-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 345 2026
amount appropriated for the previous program year, adjusted
annually on July 1 by the percentage change in the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the most recent calendar
year, published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United
States Department of Labor, not to exceed 5 percent each year.
The base student allocation for a school-year program shall be
equal for each student, regardless of whether the student is
enrolled in a school-year prekindergarten program delivered by a
public school or a private prekindergarten provider. The base
student allocation for a summer prekindergarten program shall be
equal for each student, regardless of whether the student is
enrolled in a summer prekindergarten program delivered by a
public school or private prekindergarten provider.
2. The Division of Early Learning shall annually publish
on its website the adjusted base student allocation and provide
the amount of the allocation to each early learning coalition no
later than May 1 for use in the following program year.
3. The Legislature may provide a greater base student
allocation than calculated under subparagraph 1. or additional
supplements for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
in the General Appropriations Act.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb345-00